Hawaii statutes.
[§329D-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Department" means the department of
health.

"Dispense" or "dispensing"
means the act of a licensed dispensary providing marijuana or manufactured
marijuana products to a qualifying patient or a primary caregiver for a fee.

"Manufacture" means the preparation,
propagation, compounding, conversion, or processing of a substance containing
marijuana or its principal psychoactive constituent tetrahydrocannabinol,
either directly or indirectly, by a person other than a qualifying patient or
primary caregiver for the qualifying patient's use, by extraction from
substances of natural origin, or independently by means of chemical synthesis,
or by a combination of extraction and chemical synthesis, and includes any
packaging or repackaging of the substance or labeling or relabeling of its
container.

"Manufactured marijuana product"
means any capsule, lozenge, oil or oil extract, tincture, ointment or skin
lotion, or pill that has been manufactured using marijuana.

"Marijuana" shall have the same
meaning as in section 329-121.

"Medical marijuana dispensary" or "dispensary"
means a person licensed by the State pursuant to this chapter to own, operate,
or subcontract up to two production centers and up to two retail dispensing
locations.

"Medical marijuana production center"
or "production center" means a farm or facility wholly owned,
operated, or subcontracted by a person licensed by the State pursuant to this
chapter as a medical marijuana dispensary that produces marijuana and
manufactured marijuana products solely to supply marijuana and manufactured
marijuana products to one or more of the retail dispensing locations of the
licensed medical marijuana dispensary.

"Person" means an individual, firm,
corporation, partnership, association, or any form of business or legal entity.

"Primary caregiver" shall have the
same meaning as in section 329-121.

"Production" or "produce"
means the planting, cultivating, growing, or harvesting of marijuana. "Production"
includes the manufacture of medical marijuana products pursuant to this
chapter.

"Qualifying patient" shall have the
same meaning as in section 329-121.

"Retail dispensing location" means an
establishment owned, operated, or subcontracted by a medical marijuana
dispensary where marijuana and manufactured marijuana are made available for
retail sale to qualifying patients or primary caregivers. [L 2015, c 241, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next